Utah statutes.
26A-1-114.   Powers and duties of departments.
(1)  A local health department may:
(a)  subject to the provisions in Section 26A-1-108, enforce state laws, local
ordinances, department rules, and local health department standards and
regulations relating to public health and sanitation, including the plumbing
code administered by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing
under Section 58-56-4 and under Title 26, Chapter 15a, Food Safety Manager
Certification Act, in all incorporated and unincorporated areas served by the
local health department;
(b)  establish, maintain, and enforce isolation and quarantine, and exercise
physical control over property and over individuals as the local health
department finds necessary for the protection of the public health;
(c)  establish and maintain medical, environmental, occupational, and other
laboratory services considered necessary or proper for the protection of the
public health;
(d)  establish and operate reasonable health programs or measures not in
conflict with state law which:
(i)  are necessary or desirable for the promotion or protection of the public
health and the control of disease; or
(ii)  may be necessary to ameliorate the major risk factors associated with
the major causes of injury, sickness, death, and disability in the state;
(e)  close theaters, schools, and other public places and prohibit gatherings
of people when necessary to protect the public health;
(f)  abate nuisances or eliminate sources of filth and infectious and
communicable diseases affecting the public health and bill the owner or other
person in charge of the premises upon which this nuisance occurs for the cost
of abatement;
(g)  make necessary sanitary and health investigations and inspections on its
own initiative or in cooperation with the Department of Health or
Environmental Quality, or both, as to any matters affecting the public health;
(h)  pursuant to county ordinance or interlocal agreement:
(i)  establish and collect appropriate fees for the performance of services
and operation of authorized or required programs and duties;
(ii)  accept, use, and administer all federal, state, or private donations or
grants of funds, property, services, or materials for public health purposes;
and
(iii)  make agreements not in conflict with state law which are conditional to
receiving a donation or grant;
(i)  prepare, publish, and disseminate information necessary to inform and
advise the public concerning:
(i)  the health and wellness of the population, specific hazards, and risk
factors that may adversely affect the health and wellness of the population;
and
(ii)  specific activities individuals and institutions can engage in to
promote and protect the health and wellness of the population;
(j)  investigate the causes of morbidity and mortality;
(k)  issue notices and orders necessary to carry out this part;
(l)  conduct studies to identify injury problems, establish injury control
systems, develop standards for the correction and prevention of future
occurrences, and provide public information and instruction to special high
risk groups;
(m)  cooperate with boards created under Section 19-1-106 to enforce laws and
rules within the jurisdiction of the boards;
(n)  cooperate with the state health department, the Department of
Corrections, the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Division of Juvenile
Justice Services, and the Crime Victim Reparations Board to conduct testing
for HIV infection of convicted sexual offenders and any victims of a sexual
offense;
(o)  investigate suspected bioterrorism and disease pursuant to Section
26-23b-108; and
(p)  provide public health assistance in response to a national, state, or
local emergency, a public health emergency as defined in Section 26-23b-102,
or a declaration by the President of the United States or other federal
official requesting public health-related activities.
(2)  The local health department shall:
(a)  establish programs or measures to promote and protect the health and
general wellness of the people within the boundaries of the local health
department;
(b)  investigate infectious and other diseases of public health importance and
implement measures to control the causes of epidemic and communicable diseases
and other conditions significantly affecting the public health which may
include involuntary testing of convicted sexual offenders for the HIV
infection pursuant to Section 76-5-502 and voluntary testing of victims of
sexual offenses for HIV infection pursuant to Section 76-5-503;
(c)  cooperate with the department in matters pertaining to the public health
and in the administration of state health laws; and
(d)  coordinate implementation of environmental programs to maximize efficient
use of resources by developing with the Department of Environmental Quality a
Comprehensive Environmental Service Delivery Plan which:
(i)  recognizes that the Department of Environmental Quality and local health
departments are the foundation for providing environmental health programs in
the state;
(ii)  delineates the responsibilities of the department and each local health
department for the efficient delivery of environmental programs using federal,
state, and local authorities, responsibilities, and resources;
(iii)  provides for the delegation of authority and pass through of funding to
local health departments for environmental programs, to the extent allowed by
applicable law, identified in the plan, and requested by the local health
department; and
(iv)  is reviewed and updated annually.
(3)  The local health department has the following duties regarding public and
private schools within its boundaries:
(a)  enforce all ordinances, standards, and regulations pertaining to the
public health of persons attending public and private schools;
(b)  exclude from school attendance any person, including teachers, who is
suffering from any communicable or infectious disease, whether acute or
chronic, if the person is likely to convey the disease to those in attendance;
and
(c) (i)  make regular inspections of the health-related condition of all
school buildings and premises;
(ii)  report the inspections on forms furnished by the department to those
responsible for the condition and provide instructions for correction of any
conditions that impair or endanger the health or life of those attending the
schools; and
(iii)  provide a copy of the report to the department at the time the report
is made.
(4)  If those responsible for the health-related condition of the school
buildings and premises do not carry out any instructions for corrections
provided in a report in Subsection (3)(c), the local health board shall cause
the conditions to be corrected at the expense of the persons responsible.
(5)  The local health department may exercise incidental authority as
necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this part.
(6)  Nothing in this part may be construed to authorize a local health
department to enforce an ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring the
installation or maintenance of a carbon monoxide detector in a residential
dwelling against anyone other than the occupant of the dwelling.
